Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Assessment for Promotion of Corn Industry

247.6001.
Purpose.

It is declared to be in the interest of the public welfare that Kentucky farmers who are producers of corn shall be permitted and encouraged to act jointly and in cooperation with all producers, handlers, dealers, and processors of corn in promoting and stimulating, by utilization research, market maintenance and expansion, and education, the increased use and sale, domestic and foreign, of corn and corn products; and for the prevention, modification, or elimination of trade barriers which obstruct the free flow of corn and corn products to market.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

247.6003.
Definitions for KRS 247.6005 to 247.6035.

As used in KRS

247.6005

to

247.6035

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Board” means the State Board of Agriculture;

“Corn” means all kinds and varieties of corn, including popcorn, except sweet corn and ornamental corns;

“Bushel” means fifty-six (56) pounds of corn by weight or as otherwise defined by the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA);

“Producer” means every person who produces and markets corn;

“New producer” means a producer who was not engaged in the business of producing corn at the time a referendum was conducted in accordance with the provisions of KRS

247.6001

to

247.6035

;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, cooperative, or other business entity;

“Marketing year” means from September 1 to August 31 of the following year;

“Purchaser” means any person, public or private corporation, Federal Commodity Credit Corporation, association or partnership buying, accepting for shipment, or otherwise acquiring the property in or to corn from a producer, and shall include a mortgagee, pledgee, lienor, or other person, public or private, having a claim against the producer, when the actual or constructive possession of the corn is taken as part payment or in satisfaction of a mortgage, pledge, lien, or claim; and

“Marketed” means any quantities that are sold, bartered, or for which other items of value are exchanged.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 46, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

247.6005.
Activities not deemed in restraint of trade.

No association meeting or activity undertaken in pursuance of the provisions of KRS

247.6001

to

247.6035

and intended to benefit all of the producers, handlers, dealers, and processors of corn shall be deemed or considered illegal or in restraint of trade.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 3, effective July 13, 1990.

247.6007.
Referendum on corn assessment declared to be in public interest.

It is declared to be in the public interest and highly advantageous to the agricultural economy of the state that producers of corn shall be permitted by referendum to be held among the respective groups and subject to the provisions of KRS

247.6001

to

247.6035

to levy upon themselves an assessment on corn and provide for the collection of the assessment for the purpose of financing or contributing toward the financing of a program of research, market development, and education to increase the domestic and foreign consumption, use, sale, and markets for corn and corn products; and for the prevention, modification, or elimination of trade barriers which obstruct the free flow of corn and corn products to market.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 4, effective July 13, 1990.

247.6009.
Application to conduct corn referendum.

Any existing association which is fairly representative of the corn producers of Kentucky, such as the Kentucky Corn Growers Association, may at any time after July 13, 1990, make application to the State Board of Agriculture on forms prescribed by the board for certification and approval for the purpose of conducting a referendum among the producers of corn upon the question of levying an assessment under the provisions of KRS

247.6001

to

247.6035

and collecting and utilizing the assessment for the purpose stated in the referendum. The application forms shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Applicant’s name;

Applicant’s address;

Date;

Program to be undertaken for producers;

Brief statement of how the program is to be implemented;

Referendum to be conducted on a statewide basis;

Proposed effective date of the program; and

Signature of the applicant.

Upon receipt of the application, the Commissioner shall publish the application through the medium of the public press in the state within ten (10) days of receipt.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 5, effective July 13, 1990.

247.6011.
Certification of authority.

Upon being certified by the Commissioner of Agriculture, the association shall be fully authorized and empowered to hold and conduct on the part of the producers of corn a referendum on the question of whether the producers shall levy upon themselves an assessment under, and subject to, and for the purpose stated in KRS

247.6001

to

247.6035

. The referendum shall be conducted on a statewide basis.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 6, effective July 13, 1990.

247.6013.
Referendum to be statewide.

Any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.6001

to

247.6035

shall be held on a statewide basis. The referendum may be participated in by all corn producers, including owners of farms on which corn is produced, and tenants and sharecroppers sharing in the proceeds of corn. In the referendum, individuals eligible for participation shall vote upon the question of whether there shall be levied an annual assessment in the amount set forth in the call for the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 7, effective July 13, 1990.

247.6015.
Conduct of referendum.

The manner, conduct, and management of any referendum held under the provisions of KRS

247.6001

to

247.6035

shall be under the supervision and direction of the Commissioner of Agriculture, and any and all expenses in connection therewith shall be borne by the association conducting the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 8, effective July 13, 1990.

247.6017.
Matters to be determined by the Commissioner before referendum.

With respect to any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.6001

to

247.6035

, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall, before calling and announcing the referendum, fix, determine, and publicly announce at least thirty (30) days before the date determined for the referendum, the date, hours, and polling places for voting in the referendum, the effective date of the assessment, if adopted, the amount and basis of the assessment proposed to be collected, the means by which the assessment shall be collected if authorized by the producers, and the general purposes to which the amount collected shall be applied. No annual assessment levied under the provisions of any referendum shall exceed one fourth of one percent (0.25%) of the net marketed price per bushel on the corn marketed in the state during a marketing year by any producer included in the group to which the referendum was submitted or by any person subsequently becoming a new producer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 9, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 46, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

247.6019.
Notice published by Commissioner.

The hours, voting places, rules, and regulations for the referendum shall be established and determined by the Commissioner of Agriculture and shall be published by the Commissioner through the medium of the public press in the Commonwealth of Kentucky at least thirty (30) days before the holding of the referendum, and direct written notice thereof shall likewise be given to each county or area agent in any county covered by the referendum. The notice shall likewise contain a statement of the amount of the assessment proposed to be levied, which assessment in any event shall not exceed one fourth of one percent (0.25%) of the net marketed price per bushel, and shall likewise state the method by which the assessment shall be collected and how the proceeds shall be administered and the purposes to which the proceeds shall be applied, which purposes shall be in keeping with the provisions of KRS

247.6001

to

247.6035

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 10, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 46, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

247.6021.
Distribution of ballots, canvass, and declaration of result.

The Commissioner of Agriculture shall prepare and distribute in advance of the referendum all necessary ballots and shall arrange for the necessary poll holders for conducting the referendum. Following the referendum and within ten (10) days thereafter, the Commissioner shall canvass and publicly declare the result of the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 11, effective July 13, 1990.

247.6023.
Method of collection of assessment.

If, in the referendum called under the provisions of KRS

247.6001

to

247.6035

, a majority of the eligible producers, who vote therein, shall vote in the affirmative and in favor of the levying and collection of the assessment proposed in the referendum, the assessment shall be collected in the manner determined and announced by the association conducting the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 12, effective July 13, 1990.

247.6025.
Deduction of assessment from producer’s payment.

If a majority of the eligible producers in the referendum who vote therein shall vote in favor of the assessment, the Commissioner shall notify, by certified mail, all persons engaged in the business of purchasing corn in this state, that on and after the date specified in the letter, the specified assessment shall be deducted from the producer’s payment by the purchaser, or his agent or representative, from the net marketed price of the corn. The assessment so deducted shall, on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the end of the month in which the corn is sold to the purchaser, be remitted by the purchaser to the duly certified association which conducted the referendum. The books and records of all the purchasers of corn shall at all times be open for inspection by the Commissioner of Agriculture or his duly authorized agents during regular business hours.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 13, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 46, § 4, effective July 15, 1994.

247.6027.
Kentucky Corn Promotion Council.

There is hereby established a Kentucky Corn Promotion Council composed of four (4) members appointed by the certified organization; two (2) members appointed by the association representing the largest number of corn farmers in the state; and one (1) member appointed by the Commissioner. These appointments shall be for terms of two (2) calendar years and each appointing body shall promptly file with the Commissioner the names of its respective appointees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 14, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 46, § 5, effective July 15, 1994.

247.6029.
Use of funds.

The funds, including donations from individuals, concerns, corporations, and grants from the state or governmental agencies, shall be used for the purpose of promoting and stimulating, by research, market development and education, the increased use and sale, domestic and foreign, of corn and corn products; and for the prevention, modification, or elimination of trade barriers which obstruct the free flow of corn and corn products to market. None of these funds shall be used to lobby as defined in KRS

6.611

. The duly certified association receiving the assessment funds shall, upon the advice and consent of the Kentucky Corn Promotion Council, use and disburse the same as follows:

The association may first refund to itself therefrom the costs and expenses incurred in the conduct of the referendum;

The association may spend or disburse the necessary funds therefrom for administrative costs and expenses, but no more than fifteen percent (15%) of the funds collected in any marketing year shall be so utilized; and

The balance remaining shall be used for the purposes provided in this section, as determined by the Kentucky Corn Promotion Council.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 15, effective July 13, 1990; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 68, effective September 16, 1993; 1994, ch. 46, § 6, effective July 15, 1994.

247.6031.
Refund to dissatisfied producer.

If the referendum is carried in the affirmative and the assessment is levied and collected as provided, any producer upon and against whom the assessment shall have been levied and collected under the provisions of KRS

247.6001

to

247.6035

, if dissatisfied with the assessment and the result thereof, may demand of and receive from the treasurer of the certified association a refund of the assessment collected from the producer; if the demand for refund is made in writing within thirty (30) days after the date on which the assessment is collected from the producer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 16, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 46, § 7, effective July 15, 1994.

247.6033.
Procedures to terminate assessment.

The question of the levy of the assessment on corn may be referred to a vote of the corn producers of the state by filing petitions with the certified association containing signatures of Kentucky corn producers equal in number to ten percent (10%) of all corn producers in the state as recorded in the latest United States Census of Agriculture. If after the petitions are filed and at the referendum election a majority of Kentucky corn producers voting on the question vote against the levy on corn, the assessment shall be terminated at the end of the marketing year in which the referendum was conducted; otherwise, the assessment program shall continue.

If the duly certified association of corn producers expresses in writing its desire to the Commissioner to discontinue the assessment program and terminate the program, the Commissioner shall within fifteen (15) days following receipt of the request convene the board to review and act on the request. The board, after reviewing the request and conducting whatever proceedings are deemed appropriate and necessary in connection with the request, may terminate the program effective at the end of the marketing year in which the board action is taken; and, in this event, the Commissioner shall notify, by certified mail, the purchasers of corn affected thereby of the termination of the program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 17, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 46, § 8, effective July 15, 1994.

247.6035.
Court order prohibiting unlawful practices.

When in the judgment of the board or the duly certified association, a purchaser has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices that constitute a violation of any of the provisions of KRS

247.6001

to

247.6035

, the board or the duly certified association may make application to the Franklin Circuit Court for an order enjoining the act or acts or practices, and obtain a restraining order and preliminary injunction against the purchaser.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 223, § 18, effective July 13, 1990.